Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 15
PROVISION OF RETAIL OR COMMERCIAL GOODS AND SERVICES
AT PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION TRANSFER FACILITIES
ON DEPARTMENT-OWNED PROPERTY

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act enacting this part 15, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 1999.

43-1-1501. Definitions.

As used in this part 15, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Public entity" includes, but is not limited to, a public body, as that term is defined in section 32-9-103 (11), C.R.S., and any other governmental entity, agency, or official.

"Retail goods and services" means all goods and services sold to the public.

"Transfer facility" means a public park-n-ride, bus terminal, light rail station, or other bus or rail transfer facility operated on property that is owned by the department.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 263, § 5, effective April 9.

43-1-1502. Provision of retail and commercial goods and services at transfer facilities on department property.

Any public entity other than the department shall obtain the approval of the executive director of the department before negotiating and entering into any agreement with any person or public entity for the provision of retail and commercial goods and services to the public at a transfer facility that is located on property that is owned by the department and leased to the regional transportation district or such other public entity for the operation of such transfer facility.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 263, § 5, effective April 9.

43-1-1503. Department transfer facilities - provision of retail and commercial goods and services.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 43-3-101, the executive director shall have the authority to negotiate and enter into agreements with any person or public entity for the provision of retail and commercial goods and services to the public at any transfer facility that is owned, leased, or operated by the department.

Any person or public entity obtaining the use of any portion of a transfer facility that is owned, leased, or operated by the department for the provision of retail or commercial goods or services shall enter into an agreement with the department that is consistent with section 43-1-1204. Such agreement may provide that private contributions to the department include the provision of real property, services, or capital improvements to facilities used in transit services.

Any use of a transfer facility that is owned, leased, or operated by the department for the provision of retail or commercial goods or services shall not be implemented if the use would reduce transit services or the availability of adequate parking for the public or would result in a competitive disadvantage to a private business reasonably near a transfer facility engaging in the sale of similar goods and services. The provision of retail and commercial goods and services at transfer facilities that are owned, leased, or operated by the department shall be designed to offer convenience to transit customers and shall not be conducted in a manner that encourages automobile traffic from nontransit users.

Any development of any portion of a transfer facility owned, leased, or operated by the department and made available by the department for the provision of retail or commercial goods or services shall be subject to all applicable laws, ordinances, and regulations of any municipality, county, or city and county in which the transfer facility is located, including planning and zoning regulations.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 263, § 5, effective April 9.

43-1-1504. Possessory interests in transfer facilities - taxation.

Any person obtaining a possessory interest in any portion of a transfer facility located on property that is owned by the department for the provision of retail or commercial goods or services pursuant to this section shall be deemed in control of that portion of the facility and shall be subject to property taxation to the extent of the person's possessory interest in that portion of the facility.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 264, § 5, effective April 9.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1009, § 5, effective August 7.